Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 62

Military Personnel

Subchapter 1

— Officers

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 148, § 2: Feb. 14, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the removal of officers who are substandard in performance of duty or in conduct, deficient in character, below medical standards for retention, or unsuited for military service is of paramount importance to the good order and discipline of the Arkansas National Guard and security of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

12-62-101. Appointment.

All commissioned officers of the National Guard shall be appointed and promoted by the Governor upon recommendation of the Adjutant General and must be citizens of the United States eighteen (18) years of age or older.

General officers above the grade of brigadier general shall be appointed and promoted by the Governor with the consent of the Senate. During the time that the Senate is not in session, the Governor may make such appointments subject to subsequent confirmation by the Senate.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 31, provided that all the then-present commissioned officers and warrant officers of the National Guard would hold their respective commissions in the same grade and branch after the passage of the act, and that the commissions would be held in accordance with the provisions of the act.

Any person who has been dismissed or dishonorably discharged from the National Guard of this or any other state or from the United States Armed Forces and has not been restored to duty or any commissioned officer who was discharged from the National Guard as a result of the findings of an efficiency examining board or whose resignation from the National Guard was accepted by the Governor at a time when such officer was under arrest or under charges for the commission of an offense punishable by a court-martial shall not be eligible for appointment as a commissioned officer in any force of the National Guard.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “and rules” following “regulations” in (a).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 29; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-301.

12-62-102. Prerequisites to appointment — Disqualifications.

No person shall be appointed or promoted as a commissioned officer in the National Guard unless he or she shall have passed such examination as to his or her physical, moral, and professional qualifications as may be prescribed by the United States and by this code and the regulations and rules issued thereunder.

No person shall be recognized as a commissioned officer of the National Guard and no appointment as such shall become effective until he or she shall have taken and subscribed an oath of office.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 30; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-302; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 932.

12-62-103. Assignment and transfer.

Commissioned officers and warrant officers may be assigned, reassigned, transferred, or detailed to and from units within the National Guard as prescribed by the laws of the United States and this code and the regulations and rules issued thereunder.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 32; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-304; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 933.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment inserted “and rules” following “regulations”.

12-62-104. Removal — Definition.

The Adjutant General of the State of Arkansas shall have the power to remove an officer from the ranks of the Arkansas National Guard if the officer:

Is refused federal recognition in the grade and branch to which he or she has applied;

Has had federal recognition withdrawn in the grade and branch in which he or she was formerly recognized; or

Has had state recognition withdrawn in the grade and branch in which he or she was formerly recognized.

The Adjutant General shall adopt reasonable and necessary rules to accomplish this purpose, including without limitation a rule outlining the process required to have an officer's state recognition withdrawn as provided under subdivision (a)(3) of this section that is similar to the process for the withdrawal of federal recognition under 32 U.S.C. § 323, as it existed on January 1, 2019.

As used in this section, “state recognition withdrawn” means the demotion of an officer of the Arkansas National Guard when it is determined that he or she is not qualified to be an officer in his or her current grade and branch based on a finding by a board of selection officers that the officer is:

Substandard in the performance of his or her duty or in conduct;

Deficient in character;

Below medical standards for retention; or

Unsuited for military service.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 148 rewrote (a) and (b); and added (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Acts 1985, No. 670, § 11: Apr. 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain disciplinary provisions of the state military code need to be strengthened; that this act results in the same and should be given effect prior to the 1985 annual training of the military personnel subject to the state military code; that April 1 is a reasonable date to expect that this act will have been passed by both houses and acted upon by the Governor and that a date certain is desirable for the effective date. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after April 1, 1985.”

History.

Acts 1989, No. 666, § 1; 2019, No. 148, §
1; 2019, No. 315, § 934.

Subchapter 2

— Enlisted Personnel

12-62-201. Qualifications.

The qualifications for enlistment and reenlistment, the periods of enlistment, reenlistment, and voluntary extension of enlistment, the period of service, the form of oath to be taken, and the manner and form of transfer and discharge of enlisted personnel of the National Guard shall be those prescribed by the laws and regulations of the United States relating to the National Guard now or hereafter enacted.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 33; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-401.

12-62-202. Extension of enlistments.

The Governor is authorized to extend the period of any enlistment, reenlistment, voluntary extension of enlistment and the period of service of enlisted personnel of the National Guard for a period not to exceed six (6) months after the termination of an emergency declared by him or her, the General Assembly, or Congress.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 34; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-402.

12-62-203. Discharges.

An enlisted person discharged from service shall receive a discharge in writing in such form as may be prescribed by the Governor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 37; 1985, No. 670, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-405.

12-62-204. Dropping from the rolls.

An enlisted person of the National Guard may be dropped from the rolls under such regulations as the Governor may prescribe.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 35; 1985, No. 670, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-403.

12-62-205. Restoration to duty.

An enlisted person dropped as a deserter may be restored to duty by the Governor and will thereafter serve for such period added to the time served prior to desertion as will amount to the full term for which that person enlisted.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 36; 1985, No. 670, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-404.

Subchapter 3

— Pay and Allowances

Effective Dates. Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.

Acts 1975, No. 75, § 8: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two-year period; that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1975 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this act beyond July 1, 1975 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and providing of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1975, No. 747, § 2: July 1, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that the employees, technicians and other contract personnel of the Arkansas National Guard should be afforded the same privileges as other state employees to be able to be included within membership of the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1975.”

Acts 1995, No. 1102, § 5: April 10, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain employees of the Arkansas National Guard failed to receive full credit service for their service time with the State of Arkansas; that this failure was due to an oversight on the part of the State of Arkansas and not through any fault of the National Guard employees affected; and that this situation in inequitable for the National Guard technicians and site contract employees involved. Therefore, in order to correct this inequitable situation, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 211, § 23: Feb. 26, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the removal of officers whoare substandard in performance of duty or in conduct, deficient in character,or unsuited for military service is of paramount importance to the good orderand discipline of the Arkansas National Guard and security of the State ofArkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act beingimmediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”.

12-62-301. Pay generally.

Each officer, warrant officer, and enlisted person ordered for duty by the Governor or under his or her authority by the commanding general of the National Guard shall be paid by the state for every day actually on duty the same basic pay as officers and enlisted personnel of the United States Armed Forces of equal grade, rating, and length of service and such allowances as may be authorized in rules issued in accordance with the provisions of this code or at a flat daily rate of forty dollars ($40.00) for each day of twenty-four (24) hours or less actually spent on active duty, whichever is greater. However, officers and enlisted personnel shall not receive from the state the pay and allowances provided by this section when ordered on duty thereunder in compliance with instructions from the federal government for services for which they are to receive pay and allowances from federal funds.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 184; 1981, No. 407, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-901; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 935.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the first sentence.

12-62-302. Service on boards, commissions, and courts.

Members of boards and commissions created by this code and all military personnel, detailed to serve on any board or commission ordered by the Governor, or under his or her authority by the commanding general of the National Guard, or on any court of inquiry, court-martial, or summary court, ordered by proper authority in pursuance of any provision of this code, shall be paid for each day actually employed in such board, commission, or court, or engaged in the business thereof, or in traveling to and from the same, and mileage necessarily traveled in going to and returning from such duty shall be allowed.

The pay shall be the same as for officers and enlisted personnel of the United States Armed Forces of equal grade, rating, and length of service.

Mileage payment shall be allowed for going and returning to serve any process or mandate of a military court, the distance to be computed from the place where it is served to the place where it is returnable.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “or at a flat daily rate of forty dollars ($40.00) for each day of twenty-four (24) hours or less actually spent on active duty, whichever is greater” following “service” in (b).

Enlisted personnel on duty under the orders of the Governor, but not at the time serving with troops, shall receive pay, their actual traveling expenses, and subsistence.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 186; 1981, No. 407, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-903; Acts 2019, No. 211, § 3.

12-62-303. Special duty.

Any commissioned officer assigned to special duty by the Governor or under his or her authority shall be paid for the time actually employed, and his or her necessary traveling expenses and subsistence, when such payment is authorized by the Governor.

Judge advocates shall be paid, for services and necessary disbursements in bringing any suits provided for in this code and for services in actions or proceedings by habeas corpus, certiorari, or otherwise, such compensation as shall be approved by the Governor.

All staff officers shall be paid for special service ordered by competent authority, with the approval of the Governor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 187; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-904.

12-62-304. Pay and expenses — Civil disorders.

All expenses incurred while on duty or assembled therefor by order of the Governor, upon the request of either the judge, sheriff of a county, or mayor of a city, in aid of the civil authorities, in case of riot, tumult, breach of peace, or resistance to process of this state, or to preserve the public health and safety; all expenses incurred in connection with such duty or as a result thereof, including quartering, caring for, warning for duty, and transporting and subsisting the troops; and all other expenses, including the expense incurred for pay, care, and subsistence of officers and enlisted personnel temporarily disabled in the line of duty, while on such duty, shall be paid by the county or city at the request of whose judge, sheriff, or mayor, as the case may be, the military forces of the state have been ordered out.

If troops on duty in aid of the civil authorities render service in more than one (1) county or city, the expenses and compensation of the troops shall be apportioned among counties or cities in which the service is rendered by the officer who approves the vouchers and payrolls for such expenses and compensation, certified by the officers commanding the forces, and approved by the Governor. The Governor shall allow the expenses and direct that the claims be paid to the forces ordered to duty out of the general revenue of the county or city, as the case may be. However, where the troops are called out by the Governor to aid in the prevention or suppression of contagious diseases or other causes where the entire state is involved, the expenses shall be paid by the state.

Any county treasurer or public officer who neglects or refuses to perform any of the duties required by this section shall be personally charged with the costs and all necessary disbursements of any action or proceeding brought to compel such performance, together with a reasonable additional allowance to the plaintiff or relator in the action or proceeding, to be fixed by the court.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 185; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-902.

12-62-305. Pay and care — Service injury or disability.

Members of the Arkansas National Guard or militia, during the period in which they are in the active service of the state pursuant to orders of the Governor as provided by law, shall be entitled to coverage and benefits of the workers' compensation law for state employees, §§19-10-101 —19-10-103,19-10-202 —19-10-210, and19-10-401 —19-10-406.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 189; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-906.

12-62-306. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning uniform allowances, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 667, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 50, § 188; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-905.

12-62-307. State employees.

Any member of the Arkansas National Guard who is also an employee of the State of Arkansas and is called to state military active duty and receives compensation therefor shall not be deemed to be receiving compensation in an amount greater than that established by the General Assembly as the maximum annual salary for the employee as provided in §21-5-101(b)(3).

History.

Acts 1975, No. 75, § 5.

12-62-308. Retirement system.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System is authorized to enter into agreements with the National Guard Bureau, or the appropriate federal agency, for including within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, as created by § 24-4-103, technicians employed by the Arkansas National Guard under authority of 32 U.S.C. § 709 and those contract personnel hired as state employees in accordance with the provisions of 10 U.S.C. § 2304(a)(10) [repealed].

The Arkansas National Guard may pay the employer's share to the retirement system, or any part of the employer's contributions and interest, for credited service not credited to the employee by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System from June 8, 1961, to July 1, 1975.

Any employee of the National Guard included within the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who was employed by the National Guard under the authority of 32 U.S.C. § 709, on July 1, 1961, shall be given credit for prior service rendered as an employee of the National Guard under the authority of 32 U.S.C. § 709, prior to July 1, 1957, if so employed by the National Guard on that date.

Proof of such prior service shall be in such form as shall be required by the board of trustees.

Arkansas National Guard technicians and site contract employees covered under the provisions of this section who have not received full credited service for their service time with the Arkansas National Guard from June 8, 1961, until July 1, 1975, may apply for and receive current service credit for service rendered as a full-time technician or site contract employee between June 8, 1961, and July 1, 1975.

The employee shall receive credit only if the employee pays, or causes to be paid, to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund all necessary employer contributions and employee contributions that would have been paid had the employee been a member of the system during that time, together with interest thereon at the rate of six percent (6%) compounded annually from the date the contributions would have been paid until the payment is received by the system.

The Arkansas National Guard may pay all or any part of the employer contributions and interest required.

Allow, facilitate, and coordinate requested allotments with the appropriate United States Property and Fiscal Office for purposes of the state-sponsored life insurance program.

Effective Dates. Acts 1943, No. 147, § 4: effective on passage. Emergency declared. Approved Mar. 4, 1943.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 207: approved Feb. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “Emergency declared to exist. Because the present general laws pertaining to the militia of the state have in many instances become obsolete; in other instances, sections thereof have been in conflict with the laws of the United States; in other cases, many conflicting, unworkable and redundant provisions exist; and because the recodification of the laws governing the state militia will correct the foregoing; an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in force and effect on and after its passage.”

Acts 1977, No. 86, § 4: Jan. 31, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that physicians, dentists, nurses, pharmacists, or other medical, dental, or nursing personnel should not be held personally liable for the performance of their official duties while engaged in official service as a member of the Arkansas National Guard, and that persons seeking remedies therefor should seek such remedies under the appropriate federal law or by filing a claim against the state, depending upon whether the service in the National Guard was on federal service on state service, and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to clarify the law in this respect and thereby encourage medical, dental, and nursing personnel to engage in official service in the Arkansas National Guard. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2009, No. 956, § 34: Apr. 6, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that laws concerning juveniles need to be amended and updated; that the fair and efficient administration of juvenile law is highly important to society at large; and that this act is immediately necessary because the judiciary needs to begin addressing these changes in laws involving juveniles. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

History.

Acts 1961, No. 47, §§ 1, 2; 1975, No. 747, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 11-909, 11-910; Acts 1995, No. 1102, § 1.

12-62-309. State-sponsored life insurance program — Definition.

As used in this section, “state-sponsored life insurance program” means life insurance exclusively offered to the members of the Arkansas National Guard by the National Guard Association of Arkansas.

The Adjutant General is the official sponsor of the Arkansas National Guard state-sponsored life insurance program and shall:

Facilitate all efforts to make the state-sponsored life insurance program available to the members of the Arkansas National Guard;

Provide an opportunity for members of the Arkansas National Guard to purchase state-sponsored life insurance program products;

Allow state-sponsored life insurance program representatives to provide members of the Arkansas National Guard with state-sponsored life insurance program briefings during annual training and drill weekends to educate members of the Arkansas National Guard on the benefits of the state-sponsored life insurance program; and

History.

Acts 2019, No. 922, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Privileges

12-62-401. Privilege from arrest.

The organized militia shall be privileged from arrest during their attendance at muster and attendance at drills and in going to and returning from attendance at muster and drills in all cases except treason, felony, and breach of the peace.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 190; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1001.

Cross References. Privilege from arrest, Ark. Const., Art. 11, § 3.

12-62-402. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concering exemption from jury duty, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 484, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 50, § 195; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1006.

12-62-403. Exemption from civil process.

No person belonging to the organized militia shall be served with any civil process while going to, remaining at, or returning from any place at which he or she may be required to attend for military duty.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 191; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1002.

12-62-404. Civil or criminal liability for acts in scope of duty.

Members of the militia ordered into the active service of the state by any proper authority shall not be civilly or criminally liable for any act or acts done by them in the performance of their duty.

When an action or proceeding of any nature shall be commenced in any court by any person against any member of the militia for any act done by such officer in his or her official capacity in the discharge of any duty under this code or an alleged omission by him or her to do an act which it was his or her duty to perform or against any person acting under the authority or order of any such officer or by virtue of any warrant issued by him or her pursuant to law, the defendant may require the person instituting or prosecuting the action or proceeding to file security for the payment of costs that may be awarded to the defendant therein, and the defendant in all cases may make a general denial and give the special matter in evidence.

A defendant, in whose favor a final judgment is rendered in an action or a final order is made in a special proceeding, shall recover treble costs.

If any member of such forces is prosecuted by criminal action for any act performed or committed by such member while in the performance of military duty, all the expense of the defense of such action, including attorney's fees, witnesses' fees for the defense, defendant's court costs, and all costs for transcripts of records and abstracts thereof on appeal by the defense shall be paid by the state if:

The Attorney General of the state shall be first consulted and approve the selection of the attorney for the defense;

The Attorney General may, if he or she sees fit, assume the responsibility for the defense of such member and conduct the defense personally or by any one or more of his or her assistants.

The expense of the defense, when not assumed by the Attorney General, shall be paid by the Adjutant General from funds appropriated to him or her upon vouchers and bills approved by the Attorney General.

Cross References. Claims against state, §19-10-101 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1991, No. 965, § 1, contained a preamble which read:

“The General Assembly finds that current law provides for continuances for members of the active militia who are parties or attorneys in lawsuits pending before the courts of this state and are called to active duty in service to the state, or to annual training, but there is no provision for continuances for members of the other reserve components of the armed forces, or for continuances where a soldier is called to active duty for purposes other than annual training.”

Acts 1991, No. 965, § 2, provided “The purpose of this act is to authorize a stay of proceedings in the courts of this state when a member of the reserve components of the armed forces, who is a party or attorney in the proceedings, is ordered to active duty pursuant to a written order.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added (b) and redesignated the existing text accordingly.

The 2011 amendment rewrote (b).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Property, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 605.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 197; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1008.

12-62-405. Immunity of medical personnel from malpractice suits.

No physician, dentist, nurse, pharmacist, or paramedical or other supporting personnel, including medical and dental technicians, nursing assistants, and therapists, of the National Guard shall be liable for damages for personal injury, including death caused by negligence or wrongful acts or omission of any such physician, dentist, nurse, pharmacist, or paramedical or other supporting personnel, including medical and dental technicians, nursing assistants, and therapists, while acting within the scope of his or her duties while on official duty as a member of the National Guard.

Any person seeking damages from a physician, dentist, nurse, pharmacist, paramedical, or other supporting personnel, including medical and dental technicians, nursing assistants, and therapists, of the National Guard shall seek the remedies provided against the United States by 28 U.S.C. § 1346(b) if the cause of action arose while the member of the National Guard was in federal service or by filing a claim against the State of Arkansas if the alleged acts were performed by the member of the National Guard while on official state service.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 86, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1008.1; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 52.

12-62-406. Stay of proceedings.

All lawsuits pending in any court of this state in which any attorney for either party or any party is a member of the reserve components of the armed forces and who has been ordered to a period of active duty in the armed forces of the State of Arkansas or of the United States, pursuant to a written order issued by the authority of the President of the United States or the Governor of the State of Arkansas, upon written notice to the parties and the court, shall be stayed for a period of not less than fifteen (15) days preceding the period of active duty and for thirty (30) days following the period of active duty, unless for a time less as requested by the party or attorney. The proceedings shall be stayed without regard to the number of other attorneys also representing parties litigant. Judgments, decrees, sentences, or fines rendered or imposed in violation hereof after written notice for continuance has been filed hereunder shall be void and unenforceable.

(1)This section does not apply to any dependency-neglect actions.

However, in dependency-neglect actions, a member of the National Guard or reserve component of the armed forces of the United States who has been ordered to a period of active duty in the armed forces of the State of Arkansas or the United States pursuant to a written order issued by the authority of the President of the United States or the Governor of the State of Arkansas shall be afforded the protections under the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. App. § 501 et seq., as in effect on February 1, 2011, to the same extent as if his or her duties were for federal military status.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 198; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1009; Acts 1991, No. 965, § 3; 2009, No. 956, § 30; 2011, No. 1170, § 1.

12-62-407. Exemption from traffic laws.

The military forces of the organized militia with official insignia displayed, while on authorized duty, shall not be restricted by municipal traffic regulations. They shall have the right of way on any street or highway through which they may pass against all, except carriers of the United States mail, fire engines, police vehicles, and hospital ambulances in the necessary performance of their respective duties.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 732, §§ 1-4, 6, 7.

12-62-408. Penalty for interference.

All others who shall hinder, delay, or obstruct any unit or portion of the organized militia wherever parading or performing any military duty, or who shall attempt to do so, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined in any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 193; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1004.

12-62-409. Free passage over toll bridges and ferries.

Any person belonging to the organized militia shall, together with the conveyance in his or her charge and property of the state in his or her charge, be allowed to pass free through all tollgates and over all ferries if he or she is in uniform or presents an order for duty or certificate of an order for duty.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 194; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1005.

12-62-410. Exemption from automobile tags, road taxes, and duties.

In lieu of state and city automobile tags, each active member of the Arkansas Army National Guard and the Air National Guard shall be required to affix to their respective automobile or pick-up truck, if used as personal conveyance and not used for commercial purposes, a regulation tag to be supplied by the Adjutant General bearing a serial number and a National Guard designation.

They shall likewise be exempt from the payment of any road tax and from any road duty whatsoever under the laws of this state.

Publisher's Notes. As to recording of World War I certificates of discharge, see Acts 1919, No. 304.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction fined in any sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment, in (a), substituted “called to active state duty” for “called by the Governor to active state duty”, substituted “the armed forces of this state or any other state, including without limitation the National Guard, a reserve component of the armed forces, or the militia” for “the Arkansas National Guard or as a member of the militia”, and substituted “the armed forces” for “the Arkansas National Guard or the militia” at the end.

Renewing a state:

License;

Permit;

Registration;

Credential; or

Certificate; and

Paying state:

Taxes;

Fees;

Assessments; or

Tuition.

The extension shall be allowed without penalty or assessment of a late fee.

The extension shall be effective for:

Each department, division, office, board, commission, and institution of this state, including state-supported institutions of higher education, shall promulgate rules to establish the length of the extension.

The extension established by rule shall be within the limits provided by this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(1); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 462 inserted “or state active duty” in the introductory language of (a) and in (c)(1) and (c)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 1995, No. 187, § 9: Feb. 7, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly that the 39th Bridgade of the Arkansas National Guard has been designated as an enhanced brigade carrier and will require additional personnel and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to ensure the enlistment of qualified individuals. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 265, § 9: Feb. 13, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the 39th Brigade of the Arkansas National Guard has been designated as an enhanced brigade carrier and will require additional personnel and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to ensure the enlistment of qualified individuals. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

States surrounding Arkansas have increased incentives to National Guard members, including tuition exemptions and waivers of out-of-state tuition for qualified active National Guard members;

Other states have lost National Guard units but, because of Arkansas's historically high strength, the state has been selected to receive high-priority, high-strength units, actually increasing strength requirements for certain high-readiness units;

The combined effect of these factors has caused assigned personnel strength relative to authorized strength levels in the Arkansas National Guard to decline steadily since early 1994; and

As educational requirements increase, there are fewer enlistees who can qualify for critical specialties and as officer candidates.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 50, § 195; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1006.